Utah statutes.
53B-21-105.   Disposition and use of income from operation of buildings --
Payment of principal and interest on bonds.
(1)  Except for the revenues paid directly to a trustee under Subsection
53B-21-102(3)(f), all income and revenues from the operation of the buildings
under this chapter are deposited as collected in a fund established in
compliance with the State Money Management Act of 1974.
(2) (a)  These moneys are for the payment of the principal and interest on the
bonds authorized under this chapter.
(b)  They shall also be used, to the extent provided in the resolution
authorizing the bonds, to pay for the cost of maintaining and operating the
building and to establish reserves for that purpose.
(3)  The State Board of Regents treasurer or other designated fiscal officer
shall, not less than 15 days prior to the date interest and principal payments
are due, transmit to the paying agent sufficient money from the fund to pay
the obligation.
